Massachusetts, session 194th, H2949.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
The Massachusetts Port Authority may elect to improve the retirement group
classification for any group of law enforcement employees who are members of the
Massachusetts Port Authority Retirement System by a majority vote of the authority governing
board. Nothing in this act shall be construed as authorization to diminish the retirement benefits
of public employees by placing any group of employees in a lower group of classification.
of 1